Utah statutes.
72-4-114.   State highways -- SR-81 to SR-84, SR-86 to SR-90.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-81.  From Route 30 north to Fielding.

(2)  SR-82.  From Route 102 north on 300 East Street in Tremonton to Garland; then east approximately 0.8 mile; then north to Route 13.

(3)  SR-83.  From Route 13 in Corinne westerly to Lampo Junction; then northerly to Route 84 at Howell Interchange.

(4)  SR-84.  From the Utah-Idaho state line near Snowville to a point on Route 15 at the Tremonton Interchange; then from another point on Route 15 near Roy to Route 80 near Echo, traversing the alignment of interstate Route 84.

(5)  SR-86.  From Route 65 at Henefer westerly to Route 84.

(6)  SR-87.  From Route 40 in Duchesne northerly; then easterly through Altamont; thence southeasterly through Upalco; then east to Route 40 southwest of Roosevelt.

(7)  SR-88.  From the south end of the Green River Bridge south of Ouray northerly to Route 40 east of Ft. Duchesne.

(8)  SR-89.  From the Utah-Arizona state line northwest of Page, Arizona, westerly to Kanab; then northerly to a junction with Route 70 near Sevier Junction; then beginning again at the junction with Route 70 south of Salina, northerly through Salina, Gunnison and Mt. Pleasant to a junction with Route 6 at Thistle Junction; beginning again at junction with Route 6 at Moark Junction northerly through Springville, Provo, Orem, and American Fork to Route 15 north of Lehi; then beginning again at a junction with Route 71 in Draper northerly through Sandy, Midvale, Murray, Salt Lake City, and Bountiful to a junction with Route 15 at the 500 west interchange; then beginning again at a junction with Route 15 at Lagoon northerly through Uintah Junction and Ogden to Route 91 near south city limits of Brigham City; then beginning again at a junction with Route 91 in Logan northeasterly to Route 30 in Garden City; then northerly to the Utah-Idaho state line.

(9)  SR-89A.  From the Utah-Arizona state line south of Kanab northerly to Route 89 in Kanab.

(10)  SR-90.  From Route 13 in Brigham easterly on 2nd South Street to Route 91.

